apertium-uum.uum.lexd
# Use the following command to see if forms are generating correctly:
# echo "^тʼеди<n><gen>$" | apertium -f none -d . uum-gener
#
# Use the following command to see if forms are analyzing correctly:
# echo "тʼединин" | apertium -d . uum-morph
#
# The following command just checks if something exists as a mapping:
# hfst-expand -c0 uum.automorf.hfst | grep 'тʼединин:тʼеди<n><gen>'
#
# GOLD MATCHING is anything that has output exactly match the input, i.e,
# if more than one correct forms exist of a particular item, then it will
# not generate correctly.
#
# EX:
#       echo "тʼединин" | apertium -d . uum-morph
#       тʼединин/тʼеди<n><gen>/тʼеди<n><px2sg><gen>$^./.<sent>$
#
# We NEED to make sure that we update our gold on the web-portal (?) :)

# Morphological Transducer for Urum

# Part of speech categories
# <n>      # Noun
# <v>      # Verb
# <prn>    # Pronoun
# <adj>    # Adjective
# <adv>    # Adverb
# <abbr>   # Abbreviation
# <num>    # Numeral
# <conj>   # Conjunction
# <pr>     # Preposition

# <pres>   # Present-tense
# <past>   # Past-tense

# <neg>    # Verb negation

# <iv>     # Intransitive-verb
# <tv>     # Transitive-verb

# <p1>     # First-person
# <p2>     # Second-person
# <p3>     # Third-person

# <px1sg>  # First-person singular possesive 
# <px2sg>  # Second-person singular possesive 
# <px3sg>  # Third-person singular possesive 

# <px1pl>  # First-person plural possesive 
# <px2pl>  # Second-person plural possesive 
# <px3pl>  # Third-person plural possesive 

# <acc>    # Accusative case
# <dat>    # Dative case
# <loc>    # Locative case
# <gen>    # Genitive case
# <abl>    # Ablative case
# <ins>    # Instrumental case
# <abe>    # Abessive case
# <term>   # Terminative case

# <ord>    # Ordinal
# <dis>    # Distributive

# <intj>   # Interjection
# <part>   # Particle

# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   # Right parenthesis

# Number morphology
# <pl>     # Plural
# <sg>     # Singular

# Other symbols
# >        # Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS
Nouns
Adjectives
Verbs
Adverbs
Conjunctions
Determiners
Prepositions
Particles
Interjections
Pronouns
UNKNOWN [<unk>:]
Abbreviations
Numerals
Punctuation
PropNouns

PATTERN Adjectives
Adj-Root [ <adj>: ]
Adj-Root [ <adj><subst>: ]

PATTERN Adverbs
Adv-Root [ <adv>: ]

PATTERN Conjunctions
Conj-Root [ <conj>: ]

PATTERN Prepositions
Prep-Root [ <pr>: ]

PATTERN Particles
Part-Root [ <part>: ]

PATTERN Determiners
Det-Root(1) [ <det>: ] Det-Root(2)

PATTERN Interjections
Intj-Root [ <intj>: ]

PATTERN Numerals
Num-Root [ <num>: ]
Num-Root [ <num>: ] Num-types

PATTERN Abbreviations
Abbr-Root [ <abbr>: ]

PATTERN Pronouns
Prn-Root(1) [ <prn>: ] Prn-Root(2) Cases
Prn-Misc [ <prn>: ]   # FIXME: figure out what each of these is
Prn-Pers(1) [ <prn><pers>: ] Prn-Pers(2) Cases

PATTERN PropNouns
PropN-Root(1) [ <np>: ] PropN-Root(2) Plurality? Possession? Cases 

LEXICON MetaTag
<det><dem>:[dem]
<pers><p3><sg><nom>:[nonDem]

###############
#    VERBS    #
###############

PATTERN Verbs
((V-Root [<v>:] TransitivityTag)[^[tv,iv]] Negation? VPres )[^[ar,ir]]
(V-Root [<v>:] TransitivityTag)[^[tv,iv]] Negation? VPresCond
(V-Root [<v>:] TransitivityTag)[^[tv,iv]] Negation? VPast
((V-Root [<v>:] TransitivityTag)[^[tv,iv]] Negation? VImp)[^[ar,ir]]
(V-Root [<v>:] TransitivityTag)[^[tv,iv]] VInf
((V-Root [<v>:] TransitivityTag)[^[tv,iv]] VFutIndef)[^[ar,ir]]
(V-Root [<v>:] TransitivityTag)[^[tv,iv]] VFutIndefNeg
(V-Root [<v>:] TransitivityTag)[^[tv,iv]] Negation? VFutDef
(V-Root [<v>:] TransitivityTag)[^[tv,iv]] Negation? VTransgressive
(V-Root [<v>:] TransitivityTag)[^[tv,iv]] Negation? VPP

LEXICON TransitivityTag
<iv>:[iv]
<tv>:[tv]

LEXICON Negation
<neg>:>м{A}

LEXICON VTransgressive # дієприслівник
<tsg>:>{й}{I}п

LEXICON VPP # дієприкметник
<pp>:>{й}{A}н
<pp2>:>м{I}ш

LEXICON VFutIndef[ir]
<fut><p1><sg>:>{i}р{I}м
<fut><p1><pl>:>{i}р{I}{к}
<fut><p2><sg>:>{i}рс{I}н
<fut><p2><pl>:>{i}рс{I}н{I}з
<fut><p3><sg>:>{i}р
<fut><p3><pl>:>{i}л{A}р

LEXICON VFutIndef[ar]
<fut><p1><sg>:>{a}р{I}м
<fut><p1><pl>:>{a}р{I}{к}
<fut><p2><sg>:>{a}рс{I}н
<fut><p2><pl>:>{a}рс{I}н{I}з
<fut><p3><sg>:>{a}р
<fut><p3><pl>:>{a}л{A}р

LEXICON VFutIndefNeg
<neg><fut><p1><sg>:>м{Э}м
<neg><fut><p1><pl>:>м{Э}з{I}{к}
<neg><fut><p2><sg>:>м{Э}с{I}н
<neg><fut><p2><pl>:>м{Э}н{I}з
<neg><fut><p3><sg>:>м{Э}з
<neg><fut><p3><pl>:>м{Э}зл{A}р
<neg><fut><p3><pl>:>м{Э}з     # Dir/LR

LEXICON VFutDef
<fdi><p1><sg>:>{Е}дж{A}м
<fdi><p1><pl>:>{Е}дж{A}{г}{I}з 
<fdi><p2><sg>:>{Е}дж{A}н
<fdi><p2><pl>:>{Е}дж{A}{г}н{I}з 
<fdi><p3><sg>:>{Е}дж{A}{к}
<fdi><p3><pl>:>{Е}дж{A}{к}{Л}{A}р 

LEXICON VPres[ir]
<pres><p1><sg>:>{i}й{I}м
<pres><p1><pl>:>{i}й{I}{к}
<pres><p2><sg>:>{i}йс{I}н
<pres><p2><pl>:>{i}йс{I}н{I}з
<pres><p3><sg>:>{i}й
<pres><p3><pl>:>{i}йл{A}р #
<pres><p3><pl>:>{i}й      # Dir/LR 

LEXICON VPres[ar]
<pres><p1><sg>:>{a}й{I}м
<pres><p1><pl>:>{a}й{I}{к}
<pres><p2><sg>:>{a}йс{I}н
<pres><p2><pl>:>{a}йс{I}н{I}з
<pres><p3><sg>:>{a}й
<pres><p3><pl>:>{a}йл{A}р #
<pres><p3><pl>:>{a}й      # Dir/LR 

LEXICON VPast
<past><p1><sg>:>{д}{I}>м
<past><p1><pl>:>{д}{I}>{к}
<past><p2><sg>:>{д}{I}>н
<past><p2><pl>:>{д}{I}>н{I}з
<past><p3><sg>:>{д}{I}
<past><p3><pl>:>{д}{I}>л{A}р #
<past><p3><pl>:>{д}{I}      # Dir/LR 

LEXICON VPresCond
<pres><cni><p1><sg>:>с{A}>м
<pres><cni><p1><pl>:>с{A}>х
<pres><cni><p2><sg>:>с{A}>н
<pres><cni><p2><pl>:>с{A}>н{I}з
<pres><cni><p3><sg>:>с{A}
<pres><cni><p3><pl>:>с{A}>л{A}р

LEXICON VImp[ir]
<imp><p1><sg>:>{i}й{I}м
<imp><p1><pl>:>{i}й{I}{к}
<imp><p2><sg>:>
<imp><p2><pl>:>н{I}з
<imp><p3><sg>:>с{I}н
<imp><p3><pl>:>с{I}н   # CHECK

LEXICON VImp[ar]
<imp><p1><sg>:>{a}й{I}м
<imp><p1><pl>:>{a}й{I}{к}
<imp><p2><sg>:>
<imp><p2><pl>:>н{I}з
<imp><p3><sg>:>с{I}н
<imp><p3><pl>:>с{I}н   # CHECK

LEXICON VInf
<inf>:>м{A}й{A}
<gna_impf>:>{Е}
<neg><gna_impf>:>m{A}>{Е}

# LEXICON VConditional
# See the screenshot on Telegram, lol

###############
#    NOUNS    #
###############

PATTERN Nouns
N-Root [ <n>: ] Plurality? Possession? Cases 
#N-Root [<n>:]

LEXICON Possession
# when used with Locative Case, the Posession suffixes starting 
# at a vowel can have this vowel dropped 
<px1sg>:>{i}м
<px2sg>:>{i}н
<px3sg>:>{c}{I}{н}
<px1pl>:>м{I}з
<px2pl>:>н{I}з
<px3pl>:>{c}{I}{н}

LEXICON Cases
<nom>:
<acc>:>{й}{I}
<dat>:>{й}{A}
# destinations (to Egypt)
<dat>:>к{A} # Dir/LR
# д drops when possession in <loc>
# if possession, we would use {A} instead of {Э} (?)
<loc>:>{д}{Э}
<loc>:>{д}ʼ{A} # Dir/LR
<loc>:>че # Dir/LR
<gen>:>{н}{I}н
<gen>:>{н}{I}ң # Dir/LR
<abl>:>{д}{Э}н
<ins>:>{й}н{Э}н
<abe>:>с{I}з
<term>:>{a}йдж{A}з

LEXICON Plurality
<pl>:>{Л}{A}р
<pl>:>{л}{A}р # Dir/LR
<pl>:>л{A}р   # Dir/LR

###############
#    NOUNS    #
###############

LEXICON Num-types
<ord>:>{i}ндж{I}
<dis>:>{ш}{A}р

###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################

# Fix the appostraphes in all of the texts (wiki, keyboard, corpus, ...?)
# Make sure to delete the plurality tags 
# Nominative tag for plurality cases on the wiki
# Delete the singular tag for words that are singular, keep plurality tag
# Make sure we ACTUALLY understand the vowel harmony
# Delete all of the files in /test and regenerate them after changing the wiki

LEXICON N-Root
аарға:аарға
абадан:абадан
абдал:абдал
абер:абер
абердар:абердар
абет:абет
абур-чубур:абур-чубур
абут:абут

абла:абла # "older sister"
ава:ава
ад:ад
адам:адам # "person"
азбар:азбар
ай:ай # "moon, month, saint"
айах:айах # "foot, paw, leg"
айахташ:айахташ # "friend"
айахташ:айакташ # "friend"   # Dir/LR
айван:айван # "animal, beast, livestock"
аллах:аллах # "God"
алтын:алтын # "gold"
амур:амур
ан:ан # "moment, instant"
ана:ана # "mother, old lady"
анабаба:анабаба
астʼер:астʼер # "army; soldier"
астʼер:аскер # "army; soldier" Dir/LR
ат:ат # "horse; name"
ата:ата # "father; ancestor"
афта:афта
ах:ах # "remuneration, salary, price, value, cost"
ахчы:ахчы
ахшам:ахшам
ахыз:ахыз # to appeal
ахыл:ахыл
ахыллых:ахыллых
аш:аш
аға:аға # "older brother"
ағыз:ағыз
базар:базар # "market, Sunday"
базартеси:базартеси
бал:бал # "honey"
бала:бала # "child"
балта:балта
балых:балых
бардах:бардах
барйам:барйам
бары:бары
бахчы:бахчы # "garden"
баш:баш # "head"
башлавуҗу:башлавуҗу # "founder"
баға:баға # "price, cost, value"
баға:баа # "price, cost, value"  # Dir/LR
бағыш:бағыш
баҗы:баҗы # "younger sister"
баҗы:баҗу # "younger sister"  # Dir/LR
бела:бела
бешик:беши{к}
бӱйӱк\ аға:бӱйӱк\ аға # "older brother"
бӱйӱк\ апа:бӱйӱк\ апа # "older sister"
бӱльбӱль:бӱльбӱль
вахт:вахт # "time, happiness, fate"
вахт:вахыт # "time, happiness, fate" Dir/LR
гӧңӱль:гӧң{ӱ}л{ь} # "heart, soul, desire, mood"
гӧңӱль:гӧн{ӱ}л{ь} # "heart, soul, desire, mood" Dir/LR
гӱль:гӱл{ь}
джан:джан
доғуш:доғуш
дӱнйа:дӱнйа
завот:завот
игит:игит
ич:ич
иш:иш
йасла:йасла # "manger"
йер:йер
йол:йол
йундуз:йундуз
йутайых:йутайых
йыл:йыл
йылан:йылан # "snake"
йылдыз:йылдыз # "star"
йырла:йырла
йӱз:йӱз
йӱнах:йӱнах
келиш:келиш
кичиги:кичиги
кӧз:кӧз
кӧй:кӧй # "village"
кӧк:кӧк
кӧпек:кӧпек
кӱль:кӱл{ь} # "ash"
кӱль:гӱл{ь} # "ash" Dir/LR
кӱн:кӱн
кӱн\ доғуш:кӱн\ доғуш
махлук:махлук # ???
мелайик:мелайик
мельэм:мельэм
мирон:мирон
мышых:мышых
ортанҗысы:ортанҗысы
от:от
оғул:оғ{у}л
оҗа:оҗа
падышах:падышах # "king"
пичен:пичен # "hay"
пул:пул
пычах:пычах
саба:саба
сары:сары
севда:севда
сон:сон
су:су
тʼеди:тʼеди
тахт:тахт
тиш:тиш
тӱрк:тӱрк # "song"
учхун:учхун
халх:халх
хапу:хапу
хапу:хапӱ # Dir/LR
хар:хар
хоз:хоз # "lamb"
хооншу:хооншу
хурйух:хурйух
хуш:хуш # "bird"
хыз:хыз # "girl"
чобан:чобан # "shepherd"
чырай:чырай # "face, expression, complexion"
чӧль:чӧл{ь} # "field"
шаэр:шаэр
ший:ший
ышхын:ышхын # "light"
эв:эв # "house, cottage, dwelling, room"
эв:ӱй # "house, cottage, dwelling, room" Dir/LR
эль:эл{ь} # "hand"
җан:җан
җеннет:җеннет # "heaven"

LEXICON PropN-Root(2)
Йосиф:Йосиф             <ant><m>:
Панайана:Панайана       <ant><f>:
Ирод:Ирод               <ant><m>:
Йегипит:Йегипит         <top>:
Христос:Христо{c}       <ant><m>:
Вифлейем:Вифлейем       <top>:
Алина:Алина             <ant><f>:
Саша:Саша               <ant><mf>:
Джордж:Джордж           <ant><m>:
Джонатан:Джонатан       <ant><m>:
Вашингтон:Вашингтон     <cog><mf>:
Вашингтон:Вашингтон     <top>:
Михаил:Михаил           <ant><m>:
Айтхан:Айтхан           <cog><mf>:
Ашых:Ашых               <ant><m>: # Ashiq
Ғариб:Ғариб             <cog><mf>: # Qarib (Wandering)

LEXICON Adj-Root
гӱзель:гӱзель
бӱйӱк:бӱйӱк
харт:харт
дэли:дэли
хаста:хаста
# Means hungry, however: ач does, not sure.
ачның:ачның
азиз:азиз # "holy"
йарых:йарых # "light"
тэна:тэна # "peaceful"
ахыллы:ахыллы # "wise"
ғарип:ғарип # "stranger"
блашых:блашых
аста:аста
алхын:алхын
ғарип:ғарип # "poor, unfortunate"
доғру:доғру # "straight, correct, true, direct, genuine" Dir/LR
доғру:доғур # "straight" Dir/LR
доғру:доғуру # "straight" Dir/LR
алтын:алтын # "gold; golden"
йахшы:йахшы # "good; kind"
ийи:ийи # "good"

LEXICON Prn-Root(2)
не:не       <itg>:
о:о         <dem>:
бу:бу       <dem>:

LEXICON Prn-Misc
андаче:андаче[dem]
бир:бир
бун:бун[dem]
алай:алай
алаймыз:алаймыз
ӧле:ӧле
эр:эр
нас:нас
насын:насын
абу:абу
аблар:аблар

LEXICON Prn-Pers(2)

мен:мен      <p1><sg>:
сен:сен      <p2><sg>:
биз:биз      <p1><pl>:
о:о          <p3><sg>:


LEXICON Adv-Root
даа:даа
бек:бек
бош:бош 
сора:сора
онда:онда
чох:чох
йене:йене
нас:нас
насын:насын
эм:эм # also
нас:нас
тʼи:тʼи                 # here/suddenly

LEXICON Det-Root(2)
бу:бу           <dem>:
о:о             <dem>:
